Nebraska, session 109, LB609A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $232,777 from the Financial
Institution Assessment Cash Fund for FY2025-26 and (2) $185,061 from the
Financial Institution Assessment Cash Fund for FY2026-27 to the Department of
Banking and Finance, for Program 65, to aid in carrying out the provisions of
Legislative Bill 609, One Hundred Ninth Legislature, First Session, 2025.
Total expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems from
funds appropriated in this section shall not exceed $85,000 for FY2025-26 or
$87,125 for FY2026-27.
-1-